Florida, session 2026, SB1752.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 54 55 Section 1.âSection 394.47893, Florida Statutes, is created 56 to read: 57 394.47893âDrug overdose review; Drug Overdose Death Review 58 Committee; local review committees.â 59 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT; PURPOSE.âIt is the intent of the 60 Legislature to establish multidisciplinary, multiagency, 61 epidemiological drug overdose death review committees. The local 62 committees shall review the facts and circumstances of drug 63 related deaths that occur within each committee jurisdiction. 64 The local review committees shall work cooperatively. The 65 primary function of the local review committees is to conduct 66 individual case reviews of drug overdose deaths; identify 67 factors contributing to those deaths; make recommendations for 68 system, policy, and practice improvements at the local and state 69 level; promote interagency collaboration and data sharing 70 consistent with federal and state confidentiality protections; 71 and inform prevention initiatives through accurate, timely, and 72 comprehensive data. The purpose of the local review committees 73 is to: 74 (a)âAchieve a greater understanding of the causes and 75 contributing factors of deaths resulting from drug overdose. 76 (b)âWhenever possible, develop a communitywide approach to 77 address the causes and contributing factors. 78 (c)âIdentify any gaps, deficiencies, or problems in the 79 delivery of services to individuals by public and private 80 agencies which may be related to deaths that are the result of 81 drug overdose. 82 (d)âRecommend changes in law, rules, and policies at the 83 state and local levels, as well as develop practice standards 84 that support the safe and healthy stabilization of individuals 85 and reduce preventable deaths. 86 (e)âFollowing internal review of identified cases, engage 87 community stakeholders as part of a deidentified review of case 88 findings from the review group for broader insights about gaps, 89 deficiencies, or observed themes that identify problems or 90 prevention practices. 91 (f)âImplement such recommendations, to the extent possible. 92 (2)âDRUG OVERDOSE DEATH REVIEW COMMITTEE.âThe Drug Overdose 93 Death Review Committee is established within the Department of 94 Health to review deaths resulting from drug overdose. Local 95 public health departments shall establish local review 96 committees, which shall provide review results to the Drug 97 Overdose Death Review Committee. 98 (a)âMembership.â 99 1.a.âThe Drug Overdose Death Review Committee shall, at a 100 minimum, include representatives appointed by the State Surgeon 101 General from all of the following: 102 (I)âThe Department of Health. 103 (II)âCounty and city health and human services departments 104 or divisions. 105 (III)âThe medical examinerâs office. 106 (IV)âLocal managing entities that are contracted by the 107 Department of Children and Families. 108 (V)âEmergency medical services. 109 (VI)âNext of kin of persons whose deaths resulted from drug 110 overdose. 111 b.âThe members of the Drug Overdose Death Review Committee 112 shall be appointed to staggered terms not to exceed 2 years 113 each, as determined by the State Surgeon General. Members may be 114 appointed to no more than three consecutive terms. The Drug 115 Overdose Death Review Committee shall elect a chair from among 116 its members to serve for a 2-year term, and the chair may 117 appoint ad hoc committees as necessary to carry out the duties 118 of the committee. 119 2.a.âLocal committees may include representatives appointed 120 by county health department directors, to the extent available, 121 from: 122 (I)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration. 123 (II)âCounty and city health and human services departments 124 or divisions. 125 (III)âHospitals and health systems. 126 (IV)âBehavioral health service providers and recovery 127 organizations. 128 (V)âJudges and public defenders from the judicial circuit. 129 (VI)âPoison control centers. 130 b.âThe members of a local committee shall be appointed to 131 2-year terms and may be reappointed. The local review committee 132 shall elect a chair from among its members to serve for a 2-year 133 term. Members shall serve without compensation but may receive 134 reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses incurred in the 135 performance of their duties as provided in s. 112.061 and to the 136 extent that funds are available. 137 (b)âDuties.âThe Drug Overdose Death Review Committee shall: 138 1.âDevelop standardized protocols and data collection 139 instruments for use by the local review committees. 140 2.âReview selected cases for drug overdose death review. 141 3.âMaintain a protected database of reviewed fatalities to 142 safeguard disclosure of private and protected health information 143 and to inventory the cases reviewed. The chair and vice chair of 144 the review committee shall have access to this protected 145 database. The protected database shall be created by the 146 Department of Health. 147 4.âStudy the adequacy of laws, rules, training, and 148 services to determine what changes are needed to decrease the 149 incidence of drug overdose deaths and develop strategies and 150 recruit partners to implement these changes. 151 5.âPromote continuing education for professionals who 152 review, treat, and prevent deaths related to drug overdose. 153 6.âRecommend, when appropriate, a review of the death 154 certificate of any individual who died as a result of drug 155 overdose. 156 7.âAssist the Department of Health in collecting data on 157 deaths that are the result of drug overdose. 158 8.âSubmit written reports as requested by the Department of 159 Children and Families. The reports must include: 160 a.âNonidentifying information from individual cases. 161 b.âIdentification of any problems with the data system 162 uncovered during the review process and the committeeâs 163 recommendations for system improvements and needed resources, 164 training, and information dissemination, where gaps or 165 deficiencies may exist. 166 c.âAll steps taken by the local review committees and 167 private and public agencies to implement necessary changes and 168 improve the coordination of services and reviews. 169 9.âSubmit all records requested by the Department of 170 Children and Families at the conclusion of the review of a death 171 resulting from drug overdose. 172 (3)âLOCAL STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT.âFollowing internal review 173 by the Drug Overdose Death Review Committee, external 174 stakeholders may review nonidentifiable case findings to 175 generate broader insights into the findings of cases reviewed, 176 to supplement identification of themes and problems, and to 177 develop prevention recommendations. Stakeholder participants 178 shall include representatives, to the extent available, from: 179 (a)âThe state attorneyâs office. 180 (b)âCommunity-based service agencies. 181 (c)âPersons with lived experience in recovery or loss 182 survivors. 183 (d)âLaw enforcement agencies. 184 (e)âMiddle schools and high schools. 185 (f)âPhysicians. 186 (g)âSocial workers. 187 (4)âANNUAL STATISTICAL REPORT.âThe Drug Overdose Death 188 Review Committee shall prepare and submit a comprehensive 189 statistical report by December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, 190 to the Department of Health and the Statewide Drug Policy 191 Advisory Council which includes data, trends, analysis, 192 findings, and recommendations for state and local action 193 regarding reviewed deaths from drug overdose. The data must be 194 presented on an individual calendar year basis and in the 195 context of a multiyear trend. At a minimum, the report must 196 include all of the following: 197 (a)âDescriptive statistics, including demographic 198 information, regarding victims and the causes and nature of 199 deaths. 200 (b)âA detailed statistical analysis of the incidence and 201 causes of deaths. 202 (c)âSpecific issues identified within current policy, 203 procedure, rule, or statute and recommendations to address those 204 issues from both the state and local committees. 205 (d)âOther recommendations to prevent drug overdose deaths 206 based on an analysis of the data presented in the report. 207 (5)âACCESS TO AND USE OF RECORDS AND INFORMATION.â 208 (a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the chair of the Drug 209 Overdose Death Review Committee, or the chair of a local review 210 committee, may access any information or records that pertain to 211 an individual whose death is being reviewed by the committee and 212 are necessary for the committee to carry out its duties, 213 including information or records that pertain to a childâs 214 family and all of the following: 215 1.âPatient records in the possession of a public or private 216 provider of medical care, dental care, substance use treatment, 217 or mental health care, including, but not limited to, a facility 218 licensed under this chapter, chapter 393, or chapter 395, or a 219 health care practitioner as defined in s. 456.001. Providers may 220 charge a fee for copies not to exceed 50 cents per page for 221 paper records and $1 per fiche for microfiche records. 222 2.âInformation or records of any state or local agency or 223 political subdivision which may assist a committee in reviewing 224 a death, including, but not limited to, information or records 225 of the Department of Children and Families, the Department of 226 Health, the Department of Education, the Department of Juvenile 227 Justice, the Agency for Health Care Administration, or any 228 health facility licensed by this state. 229 (b)âThe Drug Overdose Death Review Committee or a local 230 review committee may access all information of a medical 231 examiner or law enforcement agency which is not the subject of 232 an active investigation and which pertains to the review of a 233 death. A committee may not disclose any information that is not 234 subject to public disclosure by the law enforcement agency, and 235 active criminal intelligence information or criminal 236 investigative information, as defined in s. 119.011(3), may not 237 be made available for review or access under this section. The 238 committee may not disclose any information or records that 239 contain personally identifiable information of a decedent or 240 family member; health, treatment, or social service records; law 241 enforcement or medical examiner records related to the decedent; 242 or information that would identify a provider involved in the 243 care of the decedent. 244 (c)âLocal review committees may share with each other any 245 relevant information that pertains to the review of the drug 246 overdose death. 247 (d)âA member of the Drug Overdose Death Review Committee or 248 a local review committee may contact, interview, or obtain 249 information by request from a member of a decedentâs family as 250 part of a committeeâs next of kin interview process to inform 251 the review of a death. A member of the decedentâs family may 252 voluntarily provide records or information to the Drug Overdose 253 Death Review Committee or a local review committee. 254 (e)âThe chair of the Drug Overdose Death Review Committee 255 may require the production of records by requesting a subpoena, 256 through the Department of Legal Affairs, in any county of the 257 state. Such subpoena is effective throughout the state and may 258 be served by any sheriff. Failure to obey the subpoena is 259 punishable as provided by general law. 260 (f)âThis subsection does not authorize the members of any 261 committee to have access to any grand jury proceedings. 262 (g)âA person who has attended a meeting of a committee or 263 who has otherwise participated in activities authorized by this 264 section may not be authorized or required to testify in any 265 civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding as to any records 266 or information produced or presented to a committee during 267 meetings or other activities authorized by this section. 268 However, this paragraph does not prevent any person who presents 269 information to the committee or who is a member of the committee 270 from testifying as to matters otherwise within his or her 271 knowledge. An organization, institution, committee member, or 272 other person who participates or furnishes information, data, 273 reports, or records to a committee is not liable for damages to 274 any person and is not subject to any other civil, criminal, or 275 administrative recourse. This paragraph does not apply to any 276 person who admits to committing a crime. 277 (6)âDEPARTMENT OF HEALTH RESPONSIBILITIES.â 278 (a)âThe Department of Health, or any political subdivision 279 of the state operating a local review committee, may administer 280 the funds appropriated to operate the review committees and may 281 apply for grants and accept donations. 282 (b)âTo the extent that funds are available, the Department 283 of Health, or any political subdivision of the state, may hire 284 staff or consultants to assist a review committee in performing 285 its duties. Funds may also be used to reimburse reasonable 286 expenses of the staff and consultants for the committees. 287 (c)âFor the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities 288 assigned to the Drug Overdose Death Review Committee and local 289 review committees, the State Surgeon General or a county or city 290 administrator may substitute an existing entity whose function 291 and organization includes the function and organization of the 292 committees established under this section. 293 (7)âDEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES RESPONSIBILITIES. 294 Each regional managing director of the Department of Children 295 and Families must appoint a local review representative for the 296 region. The representative must have knowledge and expertise in 297 the area of drug overdose. The representativeâs general 298 responsibilities include: 299 (a)âCoordinating with the local review committee. 300 (b)âParticipating in the implementation of the drug 301 overdose death review process and all regional activities 302 related to the review of drug overdose deaths. 303 (c)âWorking with the Drug Overdose Death Review Committee 304 and the contracted managing entity to ensure that the reviews 305 are thorough and that all issues are appropriately addressed. 306 (d)âEnsuring that all critical issues identified by the 307 local review committee are brought to the attention of the 308 regional managing director and the Secretary of Children and 309 Families. 310 (e)âProviding technical assistance to the Drug Overdose 311 Death Review Committee during the review of any drug overdose 312 death. 313 (8)âRULEMAKING.âThe Department of Health shall adopt rules 314 necessary to implement this section. 315 Section 2.âSection 394.47894, Florida Statutes, is created 316 to read: 317 394.47894âSuicide review; Suicide Death Review Committee; 318 local review committees.â 319 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT; PURPOSE.âIt is the intent of the 320 Legislature to establish multidisciplinary, multiagency, 321 epidemiological suicide death review committees. The local 322 committees shall review the facts and circumstances of suicide 323 deaths that occur within each committee jurisdiction. The local 324 review committees shall work cooperatively. The primary function 325 of the local review committees is to conduct individual case 326 reviews of suicide deaths; identify factors contributing to 327 those deaths; make recommendations for system, policy, and 328 practice improvements at the local and state level; promote 329 interagency collaboration and data sharing consistent with 330 federal and state confidentiality protections; and inform 331 prevention initiatives through accurate, timely, and 332 comprehensive data. The purpose of the local review committees 333 is to: 334 (a)âAchieve a greater understanding of the causes and 335 contributing factors of deaths resulting from suicide. 336 (b)âWhenever possible, develop a communitywide approach to 337 address the causes and contributing factors. 338 (c)âIdentify any gaps, deficiencies, or problems in the 339 delivery of services to individuals by public and private 340 agencies which may be related to deaths that are the result of 341 suicide. 342 (d)âRecommend changes in law, rules, and policies at the 343 state and local levels, as well as develop practice standards 344 that support the safe and healthy stabilization of individuals 345 and reduce preventable deaths. 346 (e)âFollowing internal review of identified cases, engage 347 community stakeholders as part of a deidentified review of case 348 findings from the review group for broader insights about gaps, 349 deficiencies, or observed themes that identify problems or 350 prevention practices. 351 (f)âImplement such recommendations, to the extent possible. 352 (2)âSUICIDE DEATH REVIEW COMMITTEE.âThe Suicide Death 353 Review Committee is established within the Department of Health 354 to review deaths resulting from suicide. Local public health 355 departments shall establish local review committees, which shall 356 provide review results to the Suicide Death Review Committee. 357 (a)âMembership.â 358 1.a.âThe Suicide Death Review Committee shall, at a 359 minimum, include representatives appointed by the State Surgeon 360 General from all of the following: 361 (I)âThe Department of Health. 362 (II)âCounty and city health and human services departments 363 or divisions. 364 (III)âThe medical examinerâs office. 365 (IV)âLocal managing entities that are contracted by the 366 Department of Children and Families. 367 (V)âEmergency medical services. 368 (VI)âNext of kin of persons whose deaths resulted from 369 suicide. 370 b.âThe members of the Suicide Death Review Committee shall 371 be appointed to staggered terms not to exceed 2 years each, as 372 determined by the State Surgeon General. Members may be 373 appointed to no more than three consecutive terms. The Suicide 374 Death Review Committee shall elect a chair from among its 375 members to serve for a 2-year term, and the chair may appoint ad 376 hoc committees as necessary to carry out the duties of the 377 committee. 378 2.a.âLocal committees may include representatives appointed 379 by county health department directors, to the extent available, 380 from: 381 (I)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration. 382 (II)âCounty and city health and human services departments 383 or divisions. 384 (III)âHospitals and health systems. 385 (IV)âBehavioral health service providers and recovery 386 organizations. 387 (V)âJudges and public defenders from the judicial circuit. 388 (VI)âPoison control centers. 389 b.âThe members of a local committee shall be appointed to 390 2-year terms and may be reappointed. The local review committee 391 shall elect a chair from among its members to serve for a 2-year 392 term. Members shall serve without compensation but may receive 393 reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses incurred in the 394 performance of their duties as provided in s. 112.061 and to the 395 extent that funds are available. 396 (b)âDuties.âThe Suicide Death Review Committee shall: 397 1.âDevelop standardized protocols and data collection 398 instruments for use by the local review committees. 399 2.âReview selected cases for review of deaths from suicide. 400 3.âMaintain a protected database of reviewed fatalities to 401 safeguard disclosure of private and protected health information 402 and to inventory the cases reviewed. The chair and vice chair of 403 the review committee shall have access to this protected 404 database. The protected database shall be created by the 405 Department of Health. 406 4.âStudy the adequacy of laws, rules, training, and 407 services to determine what changes are needed to decrease the 408 incidence of suicides and develop strategies and recruit 409 partners to implement these changes. 410 5.âPromote continuing education for professionals who 411 review, treat, and prevent deaths related to suicide. 412 6.âRecommend, when appropriate, the review of the death 413 certificate of any individual who died as a result of suicide. 414 7.âAssist the Department of Health in collecting data on 415 deaths that are the result of suicide. 416 8.âSubmit written reports as requested by the Department of 417 Health. The reports must include: 418 a.âNonidentifying information from individual cases. 419 b.âIdentification of any problems with the data system 420 uncovered during the review process and the committeeâs 421 recommendations for system improvements and needed resources, 422 training, and information dissemination, where gaps or 423 deficiencies may exist. 424 c.âAll steps taken by the local review committees and 425 private and public agencies to implement necessary changes and 426 improve the coordination of services and reviews. 427 9.âSubmit all records requested by the Department of Health 428 at the conclusion of the review of a death resulting from 429 suicide. 430 (3)âLOCAL STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT.âFollowing internal review 431 by the Suicide Death Review Committee, external stakeholders may 432 review nonidentifiable case findings to generate broader 433 insights into the findings of cases reviewed, to supplement 434 identification of themes and problems, and to develop prevention 435 recommendations. Stakeholder participants shall include 436 representatives, to the extent available, from: 437 (a)âThe state attorneyâs office. 438 (b)âCommunity-based service agencies. 439 (c)âPersons with lived experience in recovery or loss 440 survivors. 441 (d)âLaw enforcement agencies. 442 (e)âMiddle schools and high schools. 443 (f)âPhysicians. 444 (g)âSocial workers. 445 (4)âANNUAL STATISTICAL REPORT.âThe Suicide Death Review 446 Committee shall prepare and submit a comprehensive statistical 447 report by December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, to the 448 Department of Health and the Department of Children and Families 449 and the Statewide Drug Policy Advisory Council which includes 450 data, trends, analysis, findings, and recommendations for state 451 and local action regarding reviewed deaths from suicide. The 452 data must be presented on an individual calendar year basis and 453 in the context of a multiyear trend. At a minimum, the report 454 must include all of the following: 455 (a)âDescriptive statistics, including demographic 456 information, regarding victims and the causes and nature of 457 deaths. 458 (b)âA detailed statistical analysis of the incidence and 459 causes of deaths. 460 (c)âSpecific issues identified within current policy, 461 procedure, rule, or statute and recommendations to address those 462 issues from both the state and local committees. 463 (d)âOther recommendations to prevent suicides based on an 464 analysis of the data presented in the report. 465 (5)âACCESS TO AND USE OF RECORDS AND INFORMATION.â 466 (a)âNotwithstanding any other law, the chair of the Suicide 467 Death Review Committee, or the chair of a local review 468 committee, may access any information or records that pertain to 469 an individual whose death is being reviewed by the committee and 470 are necessary for the committee to carry out its duties, 471 including information or records that pertain to a childâs 472 family and all of the following: 473 1.âPatient records in the possession of a public or private 474 provider of medical care, dental care, substance use treatment, 475 or mental health care, including, but not limited to, a facility 476 licensed under this chapter, chapter 393, or chapter 395, or a 477 health care practitioner as defined in s. 456.001. Providers may 478 charge a fee for copies not to exceed 50 cents per page for 479 paper records and $1 per fiche for microfiche records. 480 2.âInformation or records of any state or local agency or 481 political subdivision which may assist a committee in reviewing 482 a death, including, but not limited to, information or records 483 of the Department of Children and Families, the Department of 484 Health, the Department of Education, the Department of Juvenile 485 Justice, the Agency for Health Care Administration, or any 486 health facility licensed by this state. 487 (b)âThe Suicide Death Review Committee or a local review 488 committee may access all information of a medical examiner or 489 law enforcement agency that is not the subject of an active 490 investigation and that pertains to the review of a death. A 491 committee may not disclose any information that is not subject 492 to public disclosure by the law enforcement agency, and active 493 criminal intelligence information or criminal investigative 494 information, as defined in s. 119.011(3), may not be made 495 available for review or access under this section. The committee 496 may not disclose any information or records that contain 497 personally identifiable information of a decedent or family 498 member; health, treatment, or social service records; law 499 enforcement or medical examiner records related to the decedent; 500 or information that would identify a provider involved in the 501 care of the decedent. 502 (c)âLocal review committees may share with each other any 503 relevant information that pertains to the review of the suicide. 504 (d)âA member of the Suicide Death Review Committee or a 505 local review committee may contact, interview, or obtain 506 information by request from a member of a decedentâs family as 507 part of a committeeâs next of kin interview process to inform 508 the review of a death. A member of the decedentâs family may 509 voluntarily provide records or information to the Suicide Death 510 Review Committee or a local review committee. 511 (e)âThe chair of the Suicide Death Review Committee may 512 require the production of records by requesting a subpoena, 513 through the Department of Legal Affairs, in any county of the 514 state. Such subpoena is effective throughout the state and may 515 be served by any sheriff. Failure to obey the subpoena is 516 punishable as provided by general law. 517 (f)âThis subsection does not authorize the members of any 518 committee to have access to any grand jury proceedings. 519 (g)âA person who has attended a meeting of a committee or 520 who has otherwise participated in activities authorized by this 521 section may not be authorized or required to testify in any 522 civil, criminal, or administrative proceeding as to any records 523 or information produced or presented to a committee during 524 meetings or other activities authorized by this section. 525 However, this paragraph does not prevent any person who presents 526 information to the committee or who is a member of the committee 527 from testifying as to matters otherwise within his or her 528 knowledge. An organization, institution, committee member, or 529 other person who participates in or furnishes information, data, 530 reports, or records to a committee is not liable for damages to 531 any person and is not subject to any other civil, criminal, or 532 administrative recourse. This paragraph does not apply to any 533 person who admits to committing a crime. 534 (6)âDEPARTMENT OF HEALTH RESPONSIBILITIES.â 535 (a)âThe Department of Health, or any political subdivision 536 of the state operating a local review committee, may administer 537 the funds appropriated to operate the review committees and may 538 apply for grants and accept donations. 539 (b)âTo the extent that funds are available, the Department 540 of Health or any political subdivision of the state, may hire 541 staff or consultants to assist a review committee in performing 542 its duties. Funds may also be used to reimburse reasonable 543 expenses of the staff and consultants for the committees. 544 (c)âFor the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities 545 assigned to the Suicide Death Review Committee and local review 546 committees, the State Surgeon General or a county or city 547 administrator may substitute an existing entity whose function 548 and organization includes the function and organization of the 549 committees established under this section. 550 (7)âDEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES RESPONSIBILITIES. 551 Each regional managing director of the Department of Children 552 and Families shall appoint a local review representative for the 553 region. The representative must have knowledge and expertise in 554 the area of suicide. The representativeâs general 555 responsibilities include: 556 (a)âCoordinating with the local review committee. 557 (b)âParticipating in the implementation of the suicide 558 death review process and all regional activities related to the 559 review of deaths from suicide. 560 (c)âWorking with the Suicide Death Review Committee and the 561 contracted managing entity to ensure that the reviews are 562 thorough and that all issues are appropriately addressed. 563 (d)âEnsuring that all critical issues identified by the 564 local review committee are brought to the attention of the 565 regional managing director and the Secretary of Children and 566 Families. 567 (e)âProviding technical assistance to the Suicide Death 568 Review Committee during the review of any suicide death. 569 (8)âRULEMAKING.âThe Department of Health shall adopt rules 570 necessary to implement this section. 571 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.